Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 5 Vacation of Office

Cross references.

Recall of public officials holding elective office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para IV.

Power of Governor to fill vacancies in office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. II, Para. VIII.

Substitution of parties in action against public officer when officer dies, resigns, or otherwise leaves office during pendency of action, §

9-11-25

.

Substitute nominations to fill vacancies in party nominations upon death or disqualification, of nominee, §

21-2-134

.

Special elections and primaries, §

21-2-540

et seq.

Recall of public officers, §

21-4-1

et seq.

Delivery of books, papers, and other office property to successor to public office, §

45-6-7

et seq.

Powers and duties of Governor with regard to appointment of officers and filling of vacancies in office, §

45-12-50

et seq.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

45-5-1.
When offices deemed vacated; filling vacancy; notice; appeal.

All offices in the state shall be vacated:

By the death of the incumbent;

By resignation, when accepted;

By decision of a competent tribunal declaring the office vacant;

By voluntary act or misfortune of the incumbent whereby he is placed in any of the specified conditions of ineligibility to office;

By the incumbent ceasing to be a resident of the state or of the county, circuit, or district for which he was elected;

By failing to apply for and obtain commissions or certificates or by failing to qualify or give bond, or both, within the time prescribed by the laws and Constitution of Georgia; or

By abandoning the office or ceasing to perform its duties, or both.

Upon the occurrence of a vacancy in any office in the state, the officer or body authorized to fill the vacancy or call for an election to fill the vacancy shall do so without the necessity of a judicial determination of the occurrence of the vacancy. Before doing so, however, the officer or body shall give at least ten days’ notice to the person whose office has become vacant, except that such notice shall not be required in the case of a vacancy caused by death, final conviction of a felony, or written resignation. The decision of the officer or body to fill the vacancy or call an election to fill the vacancy shall be subject to an appeal to the superior court; and nothing in this subsection shall affect any right of any person to seek a judicial determination of the eligibility of any person holding office in the state. The provisions of this subsection shall apply both to vacancies occurring under this Code section and to vacancies occurring under other laws of this state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 131; Code 1868, § 126; Code 1873, § 135; Code 1882, § 135; Civil Code 1895, § 229; Civil Code 1910, § 264; Code 1933, § 89-501; Ga. L. 1986, p. 996, § 1.

Cross references.

Vacating of offices by recall elections, T. 21, C. 4.

Law reviews.

For note, “The Case of the Vanishing Supreme Court Contest:

Barrow v. Raffensperger

Eliminates the Power of the People to Elect their Appellate, Superior, and State Court Judges,” see 72 Mercer L. Rev. 957 (2021).

45-5-2.
Office to be vacated immediately upon final conviction of felony; filling of vacancy.

Upon final conviction of a felony, the office of any state officer shall be vacated immediately without further action. Said vacancy shall be filled in the manner provided by law for filling vacancies in such office caused by death or resignation.

History.

Code 1933, § 89-505, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 689, § 1.

Cross references.

Crimes and other actions giving rise to ineligibility of person for party nomination for or election to public office, §

21-2-8

.

45-5-3.
Election or appointment of successor to fill unexpired terms.

In those instances where the law applicable to an elective public office does not provide for filling a vacancy in such office and the Governor fills such vacancy pursuant to the authority of Article V, Section II, Paragraph VIII(a) of the Constitution, the vacancy shall be filled as follows:

If the vacancy occurs during the final 27 months of a term of office, the Governor shall appoint a person to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term of office; or

If the vacancy occurs at any time prior to the time specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Governor shall appoint a person to fill such vacancy until such vacancy is filled for the unexpired term of office at a special election provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section.

When a special election is required to fill a vacancy for the unexpired term of office as provided by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, such special election shall be held on the same date as the general election which is first held following the date of the vacancy and in conjunction with such general election.

It shall be the duty of the appropriate state or local election officials to call and conduct the special elections required by subsection (b) of this Code section in accordance with the applicable provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 21, known as the “Georgia Election Code.” Any person elected to fill a vacancy pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall possess the qualifications to seek and hold such office provided by law applicable to the office wherein the vacancy occurred.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to a vacancy which occurs in any elective office of a municipality of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1872, p. 82, § 10; Code 1873, § 138; Code 1882, § 138; Civil Code 1895, § 230; Civil Code 1910, § 265; Code 1933, § 89-502; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1152, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 166, § 2; Ga. L. 2018, p. 111, § 1/HB 907.

The 2018 amendment,

effective March 22, 2018, substituted “Paragraph VIII(a) of the Constitution,” for “Paragraph VIII, subparagraph (a) of the Constitution and in those instances where the Governor fills a vacancy in the office of district attorney pursuant to Article VI, Section VIII, Paragraph I, subparagraph (a) of the Constitution,” in the middle of subsection (a).

Cross references.

Designation of interim successors in event of unavailability of state officers following emergency or disaster, §

38-3-50

.

45-5-3.1.
Authority to fill vacancy absent quorum; appointment by Governor to fill vacancy.

When any local or general law authorizes or requires the remaining members of the governing body of a political subdivision of this state to appoint a person to fill a vacancy occurring in that body, the absence of a quorum caused by any such vacancy or vacancies shall not impair the authority of a majority of the remaining members of such body to make that appointment.

When any local or general law provides for the appointment, other than appointment by the Governor, of a person to fill a vacancy in an elective public office and such vacancy is not filled within 45 days after the vacancy occurs, the Governor shall appoint a person to fill such vacancy. A person appointed by the Governor to fill a vacancy pursuant to this subsection shall serve until such time as that person would serve had the person been appointed as provided in that local or general law.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1006, § 1.

45-5-3.2.
Filling of vacancies in office of district attorney; special election.

In those instances where the Governor fills a vacancy in the office of district attorney pursuant to Article VI, Section VIII, Paragraph I(a) of the Constitution, the vacancy shall be filled by the Governor appointing a qualified individual to the office of district attorney who shall serve until January 1 of the year following the next state-wide general election which is more than six months after the date of the appointment of such individual, even if such period of time extends beyond the unexpired term of the prior district attorney.

A special election shall be held on the same date as the state-wide November general election which is first held following the date of the vacancy which is more than six months after the appointment of an individual to fill the vacancy and shall be held in conjunction with such general election.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to call and conduct the special election required by subsection (b) of this Code section in accordance with the applicable provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 21, the “Georgia Election Code.” Any individual elected at such special election pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall possess the qualifications to seek and hold such office as provided by law.

The individual elected in the special election conducted pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall begin a new four-year term of office on January 1 immediately following such special election.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5-3.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 111, § 2/HB 907.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective March 22, 2018.

45-5-4.
Continuation in office of appointee during succeeding term.

Where any person is appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of judge, district attorney, or clerk of any court in this state under a law which provides that such appointee shall fill the unexpired term, if at the end of such unexpired term the person elected to fill such office shall not be qualified to take office, or if the person elected to fill such office shall have died prior to the end of such unexpired term, or if a vacancy shall occur from any other cause, then the person appointed to fill out such unexpired term shall continue in office during the term succeeding the one in which such vacancy occurred, in the absence of any other law for filling such term.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 169, § 1; Code 1933, § 89-503.

45-5-5.
To whom resignations to be made.

The resignations of all state and county officers and senators and representatives of the State of Georgia in the United States Congress shall be made to the Governor. If the resignation is from an office which may not be filled by executive appointment of the Governor, the Governor shall, upon receiving the resignation, promptly notify the appropriate official of the state or county to fill the vacancy or to initiate the process for filling the vacancy according to law.

The resignations of municipal officers shall be made to the governing authority of the municipality who shall fill the vacancies in accordance with law.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 133; Code 1868, § 128; Code 1873, § 137; Code 1882, § 137; Civil Code 1895, § 232; Civil Code 1910, § 267; Code 1933, § 89-504; Ga. L. 1986, p. 996, § 2.

45-5-6.
Public official investigated by special commission upon indictment; gubernatorial review if commission recommends suspension; suspension; reinstatement; replacement or temporary officer.

As used in this Code section, the term “public official” means any elected county officer; any elected member of a county governing authority; any elected member of a city-county consolidated government; any member of a county, area, or independent board of education; any school superintendent of a county, area, or independent school system; any solicitor-general of a state court; any elected member of any municipal governing authority; any member of the Public Service Commission; and any district attorney.

Upon indictment for a felony by a grand jury of this state or by the United States, which felony indictment relates to the performance or activities of the office of any public official, the Attorney General or district attorney shall transmit a certified copy of the indictment to the Governor who shall, subject to subsection (e) of this Code section, appoint a review commission. Except as provided in this subsection, the commission shall be composed of the Attorney General and two public officials who hold the same office as the individual indicted. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for any expenses incurred in connection with the investigation. The funds necessary to conduct the investigation shall come from funds appropriated to the executive branch of government. If the Attorney General brings the indictment against the public official, the Attorney General shall not serve on the commission. In place of the Attorney General, the Governor shall appoint a retired Supreme Court Justice or a retired Court of Appeals Judge.

Unless a longer period of time is granted by the Governor, the commission shall make a written report to the Governor within 14 days. If the commission determines that the indictment relates to and adversely affects the administration of the office of the indicted public official and that the rights and interests of the public are adversely affected thereby, the commission shall recommend that the public official be suspended from office. If, and only if, the commission recommends suspension, then the Governor shall review the findings and recommendations of the commission and may suspend the public officer from office immediately and without further action pending the final disposition of the case or until the expiration of his or her term of office, whichever occurs first. During the term of office to which such officer was elected and in which the indictment occurred, if a nolle prosequi is entered, if the public official is acquitted, or if after conviction the conviction is later overturned as a result of any direct appeal or application for a writ of certiorari, the public official shall be immediately reinstated to the office from which he or she was suspended. While a public official is suspended under this Code section, the public official shall not be entitled to receive the compensation from his or her office. If the public official is reinstated to office, he or she shall be entitled to receive any compensation withheld under the provisions of this Code section. For the purpose of back compensation only, reinstatement may occur after the expiration of the public official’s term of office.

For the duration of any suspension of any elected member of any municipal or consolidated city-county governing authority under this Code section, a replacement officer for the public officer suspended shall be appointed as provided for in any general law, local law, ordinance, or resolution governing the filling of a temporary vacancy in the public office affected. For the duration of any suspension of any other public official under this Code section, a replacement officer for the public official shall be appointed as provided for in any applicable general or local law governing the filling of a temporary vacancy in the public office affected. If no such general law, local law, ordinance, or resolution governing the filling of a temporary vacancy is applicable, then the Governor shall appoint a replacement officer for the public official suspended.

Upon the final conviction, the office of the public official shall be vacated immediately without further action. Said vacancy shall be filled in the manner provided by law for filling vacancies in such office.

No commission shall be appointed for a period of 14 days from the day the Governor receives the indictment. This period may be extended by the Governor. During this period of time, the indicted public official may, in writing, authorize the Governor to suspend him or her from office. Any such voluntary suspension shall be subject to the same conditions for review, reinstatement, or declaration of vacancy as are provided in this Code section for nonvoluntary suspensions.

After any suspension under this Code section, the suspended public official may petition the Governor for a review. The Governor may reappoint the commission to review the suspension. The commission shall make a written report in 14 days. If the commission recommends that the public official be reinstated, such public official shall immediately be reinstated to office.

The report and records of the commission and the fact that the public official has or has not been suspended shall not be admissible in evidence in any court for any purpose. The report and records of the commission shall not be open to the public.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to any indictment handed down prior to January 1, 1985.

If a public official who is suspended from office under the provisions of this Code section is not first tried at the next regular or special term following the indictment, the suspension shall be terminated and the public official shall be reinstated to office. The public official shall not be reinstated under this subsection if he or she is not so tried based on a continuance granted upon a motion made only by the defendant.

Unless otherwise provided by local law, in the event the Governor appoints a member of a governing authority as a temporary replacement for a suspended public official under paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of this Code section, the governing authority, by majority vote, shall select a temporary replacement who is qualified by law to serve as such member of the governing authority, to fill such member’s seat on the governing authority until such time as the suspension of the public official is terminated or the end of such member’s current term on the governing authority, whichever is earlier. Before selecting such temporary replacement, the governing authority shall advertise its intention to select such temporary replacement in the applicable legal organ at least once a week for two weeks and on the governing authority’s website, if it has one, and shall solicit applicants for such temporary replacement position.

History.

Code 1933, § 89-506, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 277, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1279, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 600, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 25; Ga. L. 2014, p. 18, § 1/SB 367; Ga. L. 2022, p. 756, § 1/SB 337.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 10, 2014, added subsection (j).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “or her” twice in subsection (c) and in subsection (e); inserted “or she” twice in subsection (c) and in subsection (i); in subsection (c), substituted “section, the public official” for “section and until initial conviction by the trial court, the public official shall continue to receive the compensation from his office. After initial conviction by the trial court, the public official” and added the last sentence; and substituted “such public official” for “he” in the last sentence in subsection (f).

Cross references.

Procedures for and effect of suspension or removal of public officials upon felony indictment or conviction, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. III, Para. I.

Suspension of public officers upon conviction of felony, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. III, Para. II.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 18, § 3/SB 367, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval, and Section 1 shall enable the temporary replacement of all persons serving as temporary replacements for suspended public officials on the effective date of this Act as well as the temporary replacement of all persons appointed as temporary replacements for suspended public officials on and after the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective April 10, 2014.

45-5-6.1.
Suspension and vacation of office of public officials convicted of felony.

As used in this Code section, the term “public official” means any elected county officer; any elected member of a county governing authority; any elected member of a city-county consolidated government; any member of a county, area, or independent board of education; any school superintendent of a county, area, or independent school system; any solicitor-general of a state court; any elected member of any municipal governing authority; any member of the Public Service Commission; and any district attorney.

Upon initial conviction of any public official for any felony in a trial court of this state or the United States, regardless of whether the public official has been suspended previously under Code Section 45-5-6, such public official shall be immediately and without further action suspended from office. While a public official is suspended from office under this Code section, he shall not be entitled to receive the compensation from his office. If the conviction is later overturned as a result of any direct appeal or application for a writ of certiorari, the public official shall be immediately reinstated to the office from which he was suspended and shall be entitled to receive any compensation withheld under the provisions of this Code section.

For the duration of any suspension of any elected member of any municipal or consolidated city-county governing authority under this Code section, a replacement officer for the public officer suspended shall be appointed as provided for in any general law, local law, ordinance, or resolution governing the filling of a temporary vacancy in the public office affected. For the duration of any suspension of any other public official under this Code section, a replacement officer for the public official shall be appointed as provided for in any applicable general or local law governing the filling of a temporary vacancy in the public office affected. If no such general law, local law, ordinance, or resolution governing the filling of a temporary vacancy is applicable, then the Governor shall appoint a replacement officer for the public official suspended.

Upon the final conviction, the office of the public official shall be vacated immediately without further action. Said vacancy shall be filled in the manner provided by law for filling vacancies in such office.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to any conviction rendered prior to January 1, 1987.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5-6.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 600, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 748, § 26.

45-5-6.2.
Suspension of “authority officials” upon indictment for felony; continued compensation; replacement officials.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Authority official” means any appointed member of a governing body of a local authority.

“Local authority” includes without limitation instrumentalities of one or more local governments created to fulfill a specialized public purpose or any other legally created organization that has authority to issue debt for a public purpose independent of a county or municipality. The term does not include state authorities. Such local authorities may have been created by local constitutional amendment, general statute, or local law.

Unless otherwise provided by general law, upon indictment of an authority official for a felony offense by a grand jury of this state or by the United States, the governing authority of the county or municipality that appointed the authority official may, by resolution entered on the minutes of the governing authority, suspend the authority official from the appointed office immediately and without further action pending the final disposition of the case or until the expiration of his or her appointed term of office, whichever occurs first. During the term of the office to which such officer was appointed and in which the indictment occurred, if a nolle prosequi is entered, if the authority official is acquitted, or if, after conviction, the conviction is later overturned as a result of any direct appeal or application for a writ of certiorari, the authority official shall be immediately reinstated to the office from which he or she was suspended. If the local authority is a joint authority or regional authority with appointments from more than one county, municipality, or combination of counties and municipalities, the governing authority of the county or municipality which was responsible for the appointment shall be authorized to suspend the indicted authority official.

If the suspended authority official is compensated for his or her duties on behalf of the local authority, the authority official shall continue to receive the compensation from his or her office until a conviction. After a conviction, the authority official shall not be entitled to receive the compensation from his or her office. If the authority official is reinstated to office, he or she shall be entitled to receive any compensation withheld under the provisions of this Code section. For the purpose of this Code section, a plea of nolo contendere shall be considered a conviction.

For the duration of any suspension of any authority official under this Code section, a replacement official for the authority official suspended shall be appointed as provided for in any general law, local law, ordinance, or resolution governing the filling of a temporary vacancy in the public office affected. If no such general law, local law, ordinance, or resolution governing the filling of a temporary vacancy is applicable, then the governing authority of the county or city responsible for the initial appointment shall appoint a replacement officer for the authority official suspended. Upon final conviction and after exhaustion of all appeals, if any, the office of the authority official shall be vacated immediately without further action. Said vacancy shall be filled by the replacement official appointed pursuant to this subsection for the balance of the appointed term of the convicted authority official.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-5-6.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 487, § 2.

Cross references.

Indictments, T. 17, C. 7, Art. 3.

Miscellaneous offenses concerning public officers and employees, T. 45, C. 11.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 487, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Corruption Prevention Act’ ”.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 487, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to any indictment handed down prior to April 20, 2001.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law”, see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

45-5-7.
Hearing of complaints against budget unit employees and proceedings thereupon; effect on tenure.

Upon information being received that any individual employed by the state government is guilty or is alleged to be guilty of irregularities, misconduct, malpractice, malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetence, incapability, or inefficiency in the conduct of his or her official duties, the head of the budget unit, department, or agency employing said person shall be notified of such charges; and if the head of the budget unit, department, or agency takes the position that the charges are unfounded and fails or refuses to discharge the individual against whom the complaint is lodged, it shall be the duty of the Governor to hear the complaint and if, in his opinion, the facts sustain the truth of the accusation, the individual shall stand discharged from state service. Nothing in this Code section shall affect the tenure of office of the elected officials of this state, nor the tenure of office of appointed officials of this state who have been confirmed by the Senate as required by law, nor the tenure of office of those employees who are subject to merit system laws and rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-424, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 17, § 1.

Cross references.

Restriction on power of Governor and Office of Planning and Budget to strike arbitrarily name of state employee from requisition for allotment of funds or from budget of budget unit, department, or agency of state government, §

45-12-94

.